North Dakota, session 69, SB2147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15-10-38.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15-10-38.1. Skilled workforce student loan repayment program - Skilled workforce student
loan repayment program fund - Continuing appropriation - Report.
1. There is created in the state treasury the skilled workforce student loan repayment program
fund. The fund consists of moneys transferred into the fund by the legislative assembly,
matching funds received, and loan repayments. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the
state board of higher education on a continuing basis for the purpose of distributing student
loan repayment grants directly to the Bank of North Dakota or other participating lender to
repay outstanding student loan principal balances for eligible applicants. The state board of
higher education may transfer money between this fund and the skilled workforce scholarship
fund established in section 15-10-38.2.
2. The state board of higher education shall adopt policies and procedures to develop,
implement, promote, and administer a skilled workforce student loan repayment program in
cooperation with the Bank of North Dakota and the North Dakota workforce development
council with the intent of attracting and retaining individuals for professional or technical skills
in high demand in this state.
3. The North Dakota workforce development council in cooperation with job service North Dakota
shall use available labor market information to determine annually the eligible high-demand
professional and technical skills and emerging occupations in this state.
4. Graduates of degree or certificate programs from institutions or entities in any state may apply
for the skilled workforce student loan repayment program. To be eligible to receive student
loan repayment grants under the program, the applicant:
a. Must have successfully completed an educational program from an institution of higher
education;
b. Must have a student loan with the Bank of North Dakota or other participating lender;
c. Following completion of an educational program, must reside and work in this state in an
eligible high-demand or emerging occupation or reside within fifty miles [80.47
kilometers] of this state and work in this state in an eligible high - demand or emerging
occupation; and

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 2
d. Must have met and shall continue to meet any requirements established in applicable
state board of higher education procedures.
5. The state board of higher education shall adopt procedures to ensure compliance with
residency and occupation requirements after completion of the educational program.
6. The state board of higher education shall distribute student loan repayment grants from the
skilled workforce student loan repayment program fund directly to the Bank of North Dakota or
other participating lender to repay outstanding student loan principal balances for eligible
applicants. The maximum annual student loan repayment grant amount for which an applicant
may qualify is five thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars, or one-third of the applicant's
outstanding student loan principal balance upon initial application for the program, whichever
is less. The maximum total student loan repayment grant amount for which any applicant may
qualify is seventeen thousand dollars.
7. If an individual is receiving loan forgiveness under any other state program, the individual may
not receive a student loan repayment grant under this section during the same application
year.
8. An individual may receive a combined total of no more than seventeen thousand dollars under
this section and the skilled workforce scholarship program under section 15-10-38.2.
9. The state board of higher education shall provide one dollar of funding for each one dollar of
funds raised from the private sector or other public sources. Any matching funds received
must be deposited in the skilled workforce student loan repayment program fund.
10. An applicant for student loan repayment under this section is ineligible if the applicant:
a. Provides or directs matching funds; or
b. Is the husband, wife, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, father - in - law ,
mother - in - law, brother - in - law, sister - in - law, son - in - law, daughter - in - law, stepchild, uncle ,
aunt, niece, nephew, or grandchild of:
(1) The individual providing or directing matching funds; or
(2) An individual authorized to make decisions on behalf of an entity providing or
directing matching funds, including a controlling shareholder, member of the
governing body, director, or managing partner.
11. The state board of higher education shall provide a biennial program report to the legislative
management by September first of each even-numbered year. The report must include
information regarding:
a. The eligible high-demand professional and technical skills and emerging occupations;
b. The number of applicants, eligible applicants, and applicants receiving awards;
c. The amount of matching funds raised; and
d. The average and total amounts awarded under the program.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 15-10-38.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 3
15-10-38.2. Skilled workforce scholarship program - Skilled workforce scholarship fund -
Continuing appropriation - Report.
1. There is created in the state treasury the skilled workforce scholarship fund. The fund consists
of moneys transferred into the fund by the legislative assembly, matching funds received, and
scholarship repayments. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state board of higher
education on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing grants to institutions of higher
education related to skilled workforce scholarships. Institutions of higher education include
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, North Dakota nonpublic
accredited institutions of higher education, tribally controlled community colleges, state-
approved educator training programs, and North Dakota institutions approved to operate by
the North Dakota board of career and technical education. The state board of higher education
may transfer money between this fund and the skilled workforce student loan repayment
program fund established in section 15-10-38.1.
2. The state board of higher education shall adopt policies and procedures to develop,
implement, promote, and administer a skilled workforce scholarship program in cooperation
with the Bank of North Dakota and the North Dakota workforce development council with the
intent of attracting and retaining individuals for professional or technical skills in high demand
in this state.
3. The North Dakota workforce development council in cooperation with job service North Dakota
shall use available labor market information to determine annually the eligible high-demand
professional and technical skills and emerging occupations in this state.
4. The state board of higher education and the workforce development council shall compile a
list of qualifying educational programs annually. A qualifying educational program is a program
resulting in attainment of an associate's degree or lower credential program that may be
completed within four semesters, six quarters, or the final two years of a baccalaureate
program. A qualifying educational program also must pertain to the professional and technical
skills and emerging occupations in high demand in this state, as determined under subsection
3. Qualifying educational programs may include degree or certificate programs.
5. Individuals enrolled in a qualifying educational program in this state may apply for a
scholarship under this section. Scholarships are limited to the amount charged each quarter,
semester, or term by the educational institution for the tuition, fees, books, and supplies
required for the qualifying educational program. The scholarships are intended to supplement
any other scholarship or financial aid grant received by a student to assist the student with the
costs of the qualifying educational program. An individual may not receive a combined total
exceeding seventeen thousand dollars under this section and the skilled workforce loan
repayment program under section 15-10-38.1.
6. To be eligible for a scholarship payment under this section, a student must be enrolled full time
in an eligible program and have at least a 2.5 cumulative grade point average, based on a 4.0
grading system, or maintain academic progress in the program according to program
requirements. A student may not receive scholarships under this section for more than the
equivalent of four semesters of full-time enrollment or six quarters of full-time enrollment.
7. Upon completion of a qualifying educational program, a student who received a scholarship
under this section must reside and work in this state in an eligible high-demand or emerging
occupation for a minimum of three years or reside within fifty miles [80.47 kilometers] of this
state and work in this state in an eligible high - demand or emerging occupation for a minimum
of three years.
8. An Except as provided in subsection 9, an individual shall repay the scholarship, excluding the
matching funds portion of the scholarship, pursuant to the terms in the individual's scholarship
award agreement if the individual fails to maintain either a 2.5 cumulative grade point average

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 4
or academic progress according to program requirements while enrolled, withdraws voluntarily
or involuntarily before the completion of the program for which a scholarship has been
received, or fails to reside and work in this state in an eligible high-demand or emerging
occupation for at least three years following degree or certificate completioncomply with
subsection 7 .
9. An individual who receives a scholarship under this section and who transfers from one
eligible academic program to another eligible academic program must complete the program
within two years and meet all other eligibility requirements to be exempt from the repayment
provisions under subsection 8 .
10. The state board of higher education, in conjunction with the Bank of North Dakota, may allow
an individual who received payment under this section to delay or cancel repayment under this
section due to financial difficulty, military service, death, or total disability.
10.11. Each quarter, semester, or term, the state board of higher education shall distribute grants to
institutions of higher education to provide the amounts necessary for the scholarships
awarded to the students enrolled in each institution.
11.12. The state board of higher education shall provide one dollar of funding for each one dollar
raised from the private sector or other public sources. Any matching funds received must be
deposited in the skilled workforce scholarship fund.
12.13. An applicant for a scholarship payment under this section is ineligible if the applicant:
a. Provides or directs matching funds; or
b. Is the husband, wife, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, father - in - law ,
mother - in - law, brother - in - law, sister - in - law, son - in - law, daughter - in - law, stepchild, uncle ,
aunt, niece, nephew, or grandchild of:
(1) The individual providing or directing matching funds; or
(2) An individual authorized to make decisions on behalf of an entity providing or
directing matching funds, including a controlling shareholder, member of the
governing body, director, or managing partner.
14. The state board of higher education may not issue a scholarship under this section which is in
excess of the total cost of attendance, as determined by the institution of higher education,
when considering all financial aid sources.
15. The state board of higher education shall provide a biennial program report to the legislative
management by September first of each even-numbered year. The report must include
information regarding:
a. The eligible high-demand professional and technical skills and emerging occupations;
b. The qualifying educational programs;
c. The number of applicants, eligible applicants, and applicants receiving awards;
d. The amount of matching funds raised; and
e. The average and total amounts awarded under the program.
SECTION 3. A new subsection to section 15-10-38.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 5
The board may not issue a scholarship under this section which is in excess of the total cost of
attendance, as determined by the institution of higher education, when considering all financial
aid sources.
SECTION 4. A new subsection to section 15-62.4-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The board may not issue a grant under this chapter which is in excess of the total cost of
attendance, as determined by the institution of higher education, when considering all financial
aid sources.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 15-62.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Supplemental state grant award.
1. An individual eligible for a student financial assistance grant under this chapter may be
considered for a supplemental state grant award if the individual's total family income, as
identified on the free application for federal student aid, is no more than eighty thousand
dollars.
2. A supplemental state grant award may not be provided for the summer term.
3. Each semester or quarter, the state board of higher education shall provide to an eligible
student a supplemental state grant award in an amount that, combined with the individual's
student financial assistance grant and any federal Pell grant award, does not exceed the
tuition charged at the institution in which the student is enrolled. The amount may not exceed
the highest undergraduate semester tuition charged at an institution of higher education under
the control of the state board of higher education.
4. If funding appropriated for this program is not sufficient to pay the full amount of the grant
award under subsection 3, the state board of higher education may prorate the amount.
5. The state board of higher education may impose deadlines to qualify for an award under this
section.
SECTION 6. A new subsection to section 15-62.5-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The board may not issue a scholarship under this chapter which is in excess of the total cost
of attendance, as determined by the institution of higher education, when considering all
financial aid sources.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 15-63-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15-63-05. Scholarship payments - Conditions.
Upon the award of a scholarship, the recipient is eligible for a credit at the enrolling institution of
higher learning or accredited career and technical education program with a physical presence in this
state. The scholarship may be applied to tuition, fees, room and board, books and supplies, and other
educational expenses not to exceed six hundred sixty-seven dollars per quarter or clock-hour term or
one thousand dollars per semester. Awards may not exceed two thousand dollars in any academic year
and may not be issued in excess of the total cost of attendance, as determined by the institution of
higher education, when considering all financial aid sources. The board for Native American
scholarships may reduce the amount of any scholarship to accord with individual financial need or
funds available. The board for Native American scholarships may set a priority application date. At the
beginning of each quarter, clock-hour term, or semester, the North Dakota university system shall verify
enrollment and other eligibility criteria set forth by the state board for Native American scholarships for

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 6
awarded applicants before issuing payment to the enrolling institution. After the enrolling institution has
deducted the amount due to the institution, the remaining balance must be distributed to the awarded
applicant for necessary expenses during the quarter, clock-hour term, or semester.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-21-02.6 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-21-02.6. North Dakota scholarship - Amount - Applicability. (Effective through July 31,
2030)
1. a. The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible
by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship, a North Dakota
academic scholarship, or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in
the amount of seven hundred fifty dollars for each semester during which the student is
enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence
in this state, maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress
toward program completion.
b. The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible
by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship, a North Dakota
academic scholarship, or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in
the amount of five hundred dollars for each quarter or clock-hour term during which the
student is enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical
presence in this state or an accredited private career school with a physical presence in
this state, maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress
toward program completion.
c. The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible
by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship, a North Dakota
academic scholarship, or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in
the amount of five hundred dollars each term if the student is enrolled in a qualifying
registered apprenticeship program within this state. The state board of higher education
and the state board for career and technical education shall establish:
(1) Procedures to administer the scholarship;
(2) Requirements for eligibility, including full-time enrollment, program progress, and a
minimum grade point average or its equivalency; and
(3) A payment schedule.
2. The state board shall monitor each scholarship recipient to ensure that the student meets the
academic and other requirements of this section. Upon determining a recipient student has
failed to meet the requirements of this section, the board shall provide notification to the
student within ten business days.
3. A student is not entitled to receive more than six thousand dollars under this section.
4. The state board of higher education shall forward the scholarship directly to the institution in
which the student is enrolled.
5. The state board of higher education may not issue a scholarship under this section which is in
excess of the total cost of attendance, as determined by the institution of higher education,
when considering all financial aid sources.
6. a. This section does not require a student to be enrolled in consecutive semesters,
quarters, or clock-hour terms.

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 7
b. A scholarship under this section is valid only for six academic years after the student's
graduation from high school and may be applied to a graduate or professional program.
6.7. A scholarship under this section is available to any eligible resident student who fulfills the
requirements of section 15.1-21-02.4, section 15.1-21-02.5, or section 15.1-21-02.10 and who:
a. Graduates from a high school in this state;
b. Graduates from a high school in a bordering state under chapter 15.1-29;
c. Graduates from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a
custodial parent in this state; or
d. Completes a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23.
7.8. a. For purposes of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, "full-time" has the
same meaning as the term is defined by the institution the student is attending.
b. A student who is enrolled less than full-time may retain scholarship eligibility if the
student is in the final semester, quarter, or clock-hour term before program completion.
The waiver of the full-time enrollment status requirement for scholarship eligibility may
not apply to a student more than once.
c. For the purpose of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, "progress
toward program completion" means earning the following minimum number of credits
after each semester, quarter, or clock-hour term disbursement to qualify for the
subsequent disbursement:
(1) Twenty-four credits after disbursement two;
(2) Thirty-nine credits after disbursement three;
(3) Fifty-four credits after disbursement four;
(4) Sixty-nine credits after disbursement five;
(5) Eighty-four credits after disbursement six; and
(6) Ninety-nine credits after disbursement seven.
8.9. For purposes of scholarship eligibility under this section, "clock-hour term" has the same
meaning as the term is defined by the state board of higher education. The state board of
higher education shall determine the conversion of:
a. Clock hours to credit hours; and
b. Percentage-based grading to grade point average.
North Dakota scholarship - Amount - Applicability. (Effective after July 31, 2030)
1. a. The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible
by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship in the amount of
seven hundred fifty dollars for each semester during which the student is enrolled full
time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence in this state,
maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress toward
program completion.
b. The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible
by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship in the amount of
five hundred dollars for each quarter or clock-hour term during which the student is

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 8
enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence
in this state or an accredited private career school with a physical presence in this state,
maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress toward
program completion.
c. The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible
by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship, a North Dakota
academic scholarship, or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in
the amount of five hundred dollars each term if the student is enrolled in a qualifying
registered apprenticeship program within this state. The state board of higher education
and the state board for career and technical education shall establish:
(1) Procedures to administer the scholarship;
(2) Requirements for eligibility, including full-time enrollment, program progress, and a
minimum grade point average or its equivalency; and
(3) A payment schedule.
2. The state board shall monitor each scholarship recipient to ensure the student meets the
academic and other requirements of this section. Upon determining a recipient student has
failed to meet the requirements of this section, the board shall provide notification to the
student within ten business days.
3. A student is not entitled to receive more than six thousand dollars under this section.
4. The state board of higher education shall forward the scholarship directly to the institution in
which the student is enrolled.
5. The state board of higher education may not issue a scholarship under this section which is in
excess of the total cost of attendance, as determined by the institution of higher education,
when considering all financial aid sources.
6. a. This section does not require a student to be enrolled in consecutive semesters,
quarters, or clock-hour terms.
b. A scholarship under this section is valid only for six academic years after the student's
graduation from high school and may be applied to a graduate or professional program.
6.7. A scholarship under this section is available to any eligible resident student who fulfills the
requirements of section 15.1-21-02.10 and who:
a. Graduates from a high school in this state;
b. Graduates from a high school in a bordering state under chapter 15.1-29;
c. Graduates from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a
custodial parent in this state; or
d. Completes a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23.
7.8. a. For purposes of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, "full-time" has the
same meaning as the term is defined by the institution the student is attending.
b. A student who is enrolled less than full-time may retain scholarship eligibility if the
student is in the final semester, quarter, or clock-hour term before program completion.
The waiver of the full-time enrollment status requirement for scholarship eligibility may
not apply to a student more than once.

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 9
c. For the purpose of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, "progress
toward program completion" means earning the following minimum number of credits
after each semester, quarter, or clock-hour term disbursement to qualify for the
subsequent disbursement:
(1) Twenty-four credits after disbursement two;
(2) Thirty-nine credits after disbursement three;
(3) Fifty-four credits after disbursement four;
(4) Sixty-nine credits after disbursement five;
(5) Eighty-four credits after disbursement six; and
(6) Ninety-nine credits after disbursement seven.
8.9. For purposes of scholarship eligibility under this section, "clock-hour term" has the same
meaning as the term is defined by the state board of higher education. The state board of
higher education shall determine the conversion of:
a. Clock hours to credit hours; and
b. Percentage-based grading to grade point average.
SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - NORTH DAKOTA UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OFFICE -
SUPPLEMENTAL STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE GRANTS. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $2,000,000, or
so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the North Dakota university system office for the purpose
of providing supplemental student financial assistance grants, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2147 - PAGE 10
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2147.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 4 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 63 Nays 26 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State